California, session 20252026, SB620.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25234 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:25234. (a) The commission shall create the Data Access Governance Committee, which shall comprise, at minimum, all of the following members and shall not exceed 12 members:(1) One representative of energy utilities.(2) One consumer advocate.(3) One representative of disadvantaged communities, as defined in Section 79505.5 of the Water Code.(4) One representative of local publicly owned utilities.(5) One representative of community choice aggregators.(6) One representative of the distributed energy industry.(7) One representative of labor.(8) One representative of energy service suppliers.(9) Two academic experts on energy utility data.(b) The Data Access Governance Committee shall meet quarterly.(c) The Data Access Governance Committee shall, on or before January 1, 2027, provide initial recommendations to the commission and the Public Utilities Commission on all of the following topics:(1) Energy utility data use guidelines, including building energy benchmarking, integrating distributed energy resource planning, grid readiness data, including hosting capacity, and reliability for preparedness.(2) Support operations and customer service.(3) Administration of energy utility data between third-party organizations, utilities, and customers.(4) Energy utility data access quality, reliability, and performance.(d) The commission may work with gas corporations, electrical corporations, and local publicly owned utilities that provide gas or electrical service, with more than 50,000 service connections in California, to enact cost-effective energy utility data programs, which may include facilitating compliance with the Customer Energy Utility Data Bill of Rights, created pursuant to Section 8382 of the Public Utilities Code, through consolidated access platforms and tools, as appropriate.(e) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:(1) “Electrical corporation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code.(2) “Gas corporation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 222 of the Public Utilities Code.SEC. 2. Section 8382 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:8382. (a) The Customer Energy Utility Data Bill of Rights is hereby created, to be administered and enforced by the commission and the Energy Commission.(b) The Customer Energy Utility Data Bill of Rights shall include all of the following rights:(1) Data disclosure protections consistent with the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (Title 1.81.5 (commencing with Section 1798.100) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).(2) The right of customers to own their energy utility data, including data used to calculate charges for service, historical and real-time load data, and any other proprietary customer information, as feasible.(3) The right to have customer energy utility data securely maintained.(4) The right of customers to share their energy utility data with third parties of their choice on a one-time or ongoing basis in a consistent, secure, and useful way.(5) The right of customers to be informed when their energy utility data is shared with third parties and to receive appropriate opt-out notices.(6) The right of customers to manage access to their meter data without requiring the use of online accounts with their energy utilities.(7) The right of customers to see their historic energy utility data over the past 24 months, as feasible.(8) The right of customers to participate in demand response programs and share data through service providers of their choice, which energy utilities shall support by eliminating barriers to access, consistent with the demand response principles adopted by the commission in Decision 16-09-056 (September 29, 2016), Decision Adopting Guidance for Future Demand Response Portfolios and Modifying Decision 14-12-024.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act or because costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SECTION 1.Section 451.10 is added to the Public Utilities Code, immediately following Section 451.9, to read:451.10.The commission shall prioritize the gathering, analysis, and independent verification of utility data used to justify general rate case proposals to ensure the cost-effective use of ratepayer funds for capital investments in electrical distribution and transmission grid infrastructure and the operation and maintenance of that infrastructure.